Idaho, session 2026, H0659.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 6, Title 19, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 19-626, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
19-626. MEMORANDUM OF AGREEMENT WITH IMMIGRATION AND CUSTOMS ENFORCE-
MENT. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "Enforcement and removal operations" means the directorate of
United States immigration and customs enforcement under the department
of homeland security that manages all aspects of the immigration en-
forcement process, including the identification, arrest, detention,
and removal of aliens who are subject to removal or are unlawfully
present in the United States.
(b) "Immigration and customs enforcement" means the federal law en-
forcement agency under the department of homeland security, with the
primary mission to promote homeland security and public safety through
criminal and civil enforcement of federal laws governing border con-
trol, customs, trade, and immigration.
(c) "Law enforcement agency" means any law enforcement agency of any
political subdivision of the state, including any municipal police de-
partment or county sheriff's department.
(d) "Section 287(g)" refers to section 287(g) of the immigration and
nationality act, 8 U.S.C. 1357(g), that permits the delegation of cer-
tain immigration enforcement functions to local law enforcement agen-
cies and that enables specially trained local peace officers to perform
specific functions relating to the investigation, apprehension, or de-
tention of noncitizens during a predetermined time frame and under fed-
eral oversight by immigration and customs enforcement.
(2) Each law enforcement agency in this state shall make an application
for a section 287(g) program for which the local or county law enforcement
agency is eligible, including but not limited to the jail enforcement model
and the warrant service officer model operated by the department of homeland
security, and shall participate in any future program or successor to an ex-
isting program.
(3) If a law enforcement agency is unable to enter into a section 287(g)
memorandum of agreement, such agency shall publish a statement declaring the


reasons for its inability to enter into the memorandum and any efforts made
to establish alternate cooperation with enforcement and removal operations
of immigration and customs enforcement.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.